Alabama, session 2026rs, HB415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
18 Section 1. Sections 27-31B-3, 27-31B-6, 27-31B-8, and
19 27-31B-9, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended as follows:
20 "§27-31B-3
21 (a) Any captive insurance company, when permitted by
22 its articles of association, charter, or other organizational
23 document, may apply to the commissioner for a license to do
24 any and all insurance defined in Sections 27-5-2, 27-5-4, and
25 27-5-5, in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8),
26 (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), and (14) of subsection (a) of
27 Section 27-5-6, in Sections 27-5-7, 27-5-8, 27-5-9, and
28 27-5-10, and to grant annuity contracts as defined in Section
Page 1

27-5-10, and to grant annuity contracts as defined in Section
HB415 Enrolled
29 27-5-3, subject, however, to all of the following:
30 (1) No pure captive insurance company may insure any
31 risks other than those of its parent and affiliated companies
32 or controlled unaffiliated business.
33 (2) No agency captive insurance company may insure
34 risks other than those affiliated with the controlling
35 insurance producer.
36 (3) No association captive insurance company may insure
37 any risks other than those of the member organizations of its
38 association, and their affiliated companies.
39 (4) No industrial insured captive insurance company may
40 insure any risks other than those of the industrial insureds
41 that comprise the industrial insured group, and their
42 affiliated companies.
43 (5) No risk retention group may insure any risks other
44 than those of its members and owners.
45 (6) No captive insurance company may provide personal
46 motor vehicle coverage or any component thereof. Homeowner's
47 insurance coverage may be written by an Alabama Coastal
48 Captive Insurance Company as defined in Chapter 31C, but only
49 in the gulf front, beach, and seacoast areas as designated by
50 the Insurance Services Office, Inc.
51 (7) No captive insurance company may accept or cede
52 reinsurance except as provided in Section 27-31B-13.
53 (8) Any captive insurance company may provide excess
54 workers' compensation insurance to its parent and affiliated
55 companies and member organizations unless prohibited by the
56 laws of the state having jurisdiction over the transaction.
Page 2

laws of the state having jurisdiction over the transaction.
HB415 Enrolled
57 Any captive insurance company may reinsure workers'
58 compensation.
59 (9) Any captive insurance company which insures risks
60 described in Sections 27-5-2 and 27-5-4 shall comply with all
61 applicable state and federal laws.
62 (10) Insurance may be placed on risks in alien and
63 foreign jurisdictions if the underlying business in the
64 jurisdiction is legal in the jurisdiction, subject to
65 commissioner approval.
66 (11) No protected cell captive insurance company may
67 insure any risks other than those of its participants.
68 (b) To conduct insurance business in this state, a
69 captive insurance company shall comply with all of the
70 following:
71 (1) It must obtain from the commissioner a license
72 authorizing it to do insurance business in this state.
73 (2) Its board of directors or managers, or in the case
74 of a reciprocal insurer, its subscribers' advisory committee,
75 must hold at least one meeting each year in this state.
76 (3) It must maintain its principal place of business in
77 this state, or in the case of a branch captive insurance
78 company, maintain a place of business for its branch
79 operations in this state.
80 (4) It must appoint a registered agent to accept
81 service of process and to otherwise act on its behalf in this
82 state; subject further to the following:
83 a. If formed as a corporation or other legal entity,
84 whenever the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence
Page 3

whenever the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence
HB415 Enrolled
85 be found at the registered office of the captive insurance
86 company, the Secretary of State shall be an agent of the
87 captive insurance company upon whom any process, notice, or
88 demand may be served.
89 b. If formed as a reciprocal insurer, whenever the
90 registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at
91 the registered office of the captive insurance company, the
92 commissioner shall be an agent of the captive insurance
93 company upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be
94 served.
95 (5) It must own a financial account with a bank or
96 credit union with a brick and mortar location in Alabama
97 approved by the commissioner or a veteran-related financial
98 institution approved by the commissioner.
99 (6)a. It must employ or enter into a contract with a
100 natural person or business organization to manage the affairs
101 of the captive insurer that meets the standards of competence
102 and experience satisfactory to the commissioner.
103 b. The captive insurer shall promptly notify the
104 commissioner of any failure of the captive insurer to comply
105 with this chapter.
106 c. The commissioner may require a captive insurer to
107 discharge a captive manager for failure to substantively
108 fulfill the captive manager's duties under this chapter.
109 d. The captive manager, if a natural person, or the
110 officers and directors of the captive manager, if a business
111 organization, shall not serve as the president of a captive
112 insurer, except in the case where a captive insurer has
Page 4

insurer, except in the case where a captive insurer has
HB415 Enrolled
113 contracted with its parent or its affiliated companies or a
114 controlled unaffiliated business for captive management
115 services.
116 (7) It must employ or enter into a contract with a
117 qualified and experienced independent certified public
118 accountant that is approved by the commissioner.
119 (8) It must employ or enter into a contract with a
120 qualified and experienced actuary who is approved by the
121 commissioner.
122 (9) It must submit biographical background information,
123 on a form prescribed by the commissioner, for each director
124 and officer of the captive insurer and for each person who
125 controls, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the
126 captive insurer.
127 (10) It must submit a plan of operation that clearly
128 indicates the method of operation of the captive insurer
129 including all of the following items:
130 a. The types and limits of insurance that will be
131 provided.
132 b. Pro forma financial statements for a period covering
133 three years, which shall include a balance sheet, income
134 statement, and cash flow statement.
135 c. A description of the captive insurer's reinsurance
136 program.
137 d. A description of the captive insurer's underwriting
138 policy, including who will perform those functions.
139 e. A description of the captive insurer's claims
140 handling procedures, including who will perform those
Page 5

handling procedures, including who will perform those
HB415 Enrolled
141 functions.
142 f. A description of the captive insurer's investment
143 policy.
144 g. A description of the captive insurer's rate making
145 policies and procedures.
146 (11) It must submit a feasibility study, or other
147 analysis, prepared by a qualified actuary.
148 (12) It must submit a statement disclosing the identity
149 and percentage of ownership of the captive insurer for all
150 persons who control, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or
151 more of the captive insurer.
152 (13) It must submit evidence of its beneficial
153 ownership, sponsorship, or membership.
154 (14) It must submit any other factors or information
155 deemed relevant by the commissioner in ascertaining whether
156 the proposed captive insurance company will be able to meet
157 its policy obligations.
158 (c) If there is a subsequent material change in any
159 item or information submitted pursuant to subsection (b)
160 including, but not limited to, the plan of operation, the
161 captive insurer shall submit an appropriate revision for
162 approval by the commissioner. The captive insurer may not
163 offer any additional kinds of insurance until a revision of
164 the description is approved by the commissioner.
165 (c)(d)(1) Before receiving a license, a captive
166 insurance company shall comply with one of the following:
167 a. If formed as a corporation or other legal entity, it
168 shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of its
Page 6

shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of its
HB415 Enrolled
169 organizational documents and bylaws, a statement under oath of
170 its president and secretary or other authorized official
171 showing its financial condition, and any other statements or
172 documents required by the commissioner.
173 b. If formed as a reciprocal insurer, it shall comply
174 with both of the following:
175 1. File with the commissioner a certified copy of the
176 power of attorney of its attorney-in-fact, a certified copy of
177 its subscribers' agreement, a statement under oath of its
178 attorney-in-fact showing its financial condition, and any
179 other statements or documents required by the commissioner.
180 2. Submit to the commissioner for approval a
181 description of the coverages, deductibles, coverage limits,
182 and rates, together with any additional information as the
183 commissioner may reasonably require. In the event of any
184 subsequent material change in any item in the description, the
185 reciprocal captive insurance company shall submit to the
186 commissioner for approval an appropriate revision and shall
187 not offer any additional kinds of insurance until a revision
188 of the description is approved by the commissioner. The
189 reciprocal captive insurance company shall inform the
190 commissioner of any material change in rates within 30 days of
191 the adoption of the change.
192 (2) In addition to the information required by
193 subdivision (1), each applicant captive insurance company
194 shall file with the commissioner evidence of all of the
195 following:
196 a. The amount and liquidity of its assets relative to
Page 7

a. The amount and liquidity of its assets relative to
HB415 Enrolled
197 the risks to be assumed.
198 b. The adequacy of the expertise, experience, and
199 character of the person or persons who will manage it.
200 c. The overall soundness of its plan of operation.
201 d. The adequacy of the loss prevention programs of its
202 parent, member organizations, industrial insureds, or other
203 insureds as applicable.
204 e. Any other factors deemed relevant by the
205 commissioner in ascertaining whether the proposed captive
206 insurance company will be able to meet its policy obligations.
207 (3) In addition to the information required by
208 subdivisions (1) and (2), each applicant protected cell
209 captive insurance company shall file with the commissioner all
210 of the following:
211 a. A business plan demonstrating how the applicant will
212 account for the loss and expense experience of each protected
213 cell at a level of detail found to be sufficient by the
214 commissioner and how it will report the experience to the
215 commissioner.
216 b. A statement acknowledging that all financial records
217 of the protected cell captive insurance company, including
218 records pertaining to any protected cells, shall be made
219 available for inspection or examination by the commissioner or
220 the commissioner's designated agent.
221 c. All contracts or sample contracts between the
222 protected cell captive insurance company and any participants.
223 d. Evidence that expenses shall be allocated to each
224 protected cell in a fair and equitable manner.
Page 8

protected cell in a fair and equitable manner.
HB415 Enrolled
225 (4) Information submitted pursuant to this subsection
226 shall be and remain confidential, and may not be made public
227 by the commissioner or by an employee or agent of the
228 commissioner without the written consent of the company,
229 except as provided in the following:
230 a. The information may be discoverable by a party in a
231 civil action or contested case to which the captive insurance
232 company that submitted the information is a party, upon a
233 showing by the party seeking to discover the information that:
234 (i) the information sought is relevant to and necessary for
235 the furtherance of the action or case,; (ii) the information
236 sought is unavailable from other nonconfidential sources,; and
237 (iii) a subpoena issued by a judicial or administrative
238 officer of competent jurisdiction has been submitted to the
239 commissioner. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this subdivision
240 shall not apply to any industrial insured captive insurance
241 company insuring the risks of an industrial insured group as
242 defined in paragraph b. of subdivision (19) of Section
243 27-31B-2(19)b. or to a captive risk retention group.
244 b. The commissioner may disclose the information to a
245 public officer having jurisdiction over the regulation of
246 insurance in another state, provided that: (i) the public
247 official shall agree agrees in writing to maintain the
248 confidentiality of the information,; and (ii) the laws of the
249 state in which the public official serves require the
250 information to be and to remain confidential.
251 (d)(e) Each captive insurance company shall pay to the
252 commissioner a nonrefundable fee as set forth in Section
Page 9

commissioner a nonrefundable fee as set forth in Section
HB415 Enrolled
253 27-31B-4 for examining, investigating, and processing its
254 application for license, and the commissioner is authorized to
255 may retain legal, financial, and examination services from
256 outside the department, the reasonable cost of which may be
257 charged against the applicant in accordance with Section
258 27-2-25. In addition, each captive insurance company shall pay
259 a license fee for the year of registration and a renewal fee
260 for each year thereafter as set forth in Section 27-31B-4.
261 (e)(f) If the commissioner is satisfied that the
262 documents and statements filed by a captive insurance company
263 comply with this chapter, the commissioner may grant a license
264 authorizing the company to do conduct insurance business in
265 this state until April 1 thereafter, which license may be
266 renewed.
267 (f)(g)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
268 chapter, the commissioner may issue a provisional license to
269 any applicant captive insurance company for a period not to
270 exceed 60 days if the commissioner deems that the public
271 interest will be served by the issuance of the provisional
272 license.
273 (2) As a condition precedent to the issuance of a
274 provisional license under this subsection, the applicant shall
275 have filed a complete application containing all information
276 required by this section, paid all fees required for
277 licensure, and the commissioner shall have made a preliminary
278 finding that the expertise, experience, and character of the
279 person or persons who will control and manage the captive
280 insurer are acceptable.
Page 10

insurer are acceptable.
HB415 Enrolled
281 (3) The commissioner, by order, may limit the authority
282 of any provisional licensee in any way deemed necessary to
283 protect insureds and the public. The commissioner, by order,
284 may revoke a provisional license if the interests of insureds
285 or the public are endangered. If the applicant fails to
286 complete the regular licensure application process within the
287 60-day provisional period, the provisional license shall
288 terminate automatically at the end of the 60-day period, and
289 any policy issued during the provisional period shall be
290 cancelled as of the termination date and any premium unearned
291 shall be refunded to the policyholder within 10 days."
292 "§27-31B-6
293 (a) No captive insurance company shall be issued a
294 license unless it shall possess the captive insurance company
295 possesses and thereafter maintain maintains unimpaired paid-in
296 capital and surplus as follows:
297 (1) In the case of a pure captive insurance company,
298 not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) two
299 hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or another amount
300 determined by the commissioner and actuarially supported by a
301 feasibility study.
302 (2) In the case of an agency captive insurance company,
303 not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or
304 another amount determined by the commissioner and actuarially
305 supported by a feasibility study.
306 (3) In the case of an association captive insurance
307 company or risk retention group, not less than five hundred
308 thousand dollars ($500,000) or another amount determined by
Page 11

thousand dollars ($500,000) or another amount determined by
HB415 Enrolled
309 the commissioner and actuarially supported by a feasibility
310 study.
311 (4) In the case of an industrial insured captive
312 insurance company, not less than five hundred thousand dollars
313 ($500,000).
314 (5) In the case of a reinsurance captive insurance
315 company, not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or
316 another amount determined by the commissioner and actuarially
317 supported by a feasibility study one million dollars
318 ($1,000,000).
319 (6) In the case of a protected cell captive insurance
320 company, not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
321 two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or another
322 amount determined by the commissioner and actuarially
323 supported by a feasibility study.
324 (7) In the case of a branch captive insurance company,
325 not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
326 (8) In the case of a risk retention group, not less
327 than one million dollars ($1,000,000) or another amount
328 determined by the commissioner and actuarially supported by a
329 feasibility study.
330 (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a),
331 no captive insurance company organized as a reciprocal insurer
332 under this chapter shall be issued a license unless it has the
333 captive insurance company organized as a reciprocal insurer
334 possesses and thereafter maintains free surplus of one million
335 dollars ($1,000,000).
336 (c) The commissioner may prescribe additional capital
Page 12

(c) The commissioner may prescribe additional capital
HB415 Enrolled
337 and surplus based upon the type, volume, and nature of
338 insurance business transacted.
339 (d) Capital and surplus may be in the form of cash,
340 cash equivalents, surplus note, securities meeting the
341 eligibility requirements of Section 27-6-3, or, if approved by
342 the commissioner, a clean, irrevocable, and unconditional
343 letter of credit issued by a bank chartered by the State of
344 Alabama or a member bank of the Federal Reserve System and
345 approved by the commissioner. No assets of the captive insurer
346 shall be pledged or encumbered for the payment of the letter
347 of credit.
348 (e) In the case of a branch captive insurance company,
349 as security for the payment of liabilities attributable to the
350 branch operations, the commissioner may require collateral
351 equal to the amount of net loss reserves on branch business
352 plus other insurance liabilities as determined by the
353 commissioner to be maintained by the branch captive insurance
354 company in a manner acceptable to the commissioner.
355 (f) Any captive insurance company formed under this
356 chapter may be capitalized with a surplus note. Any captive
357 insurance company issuing a surplus note pursuant to this
358 section must execute a written agreement with the creditor
359 providing the following:
360 a. The creditor may only be paid out of the portion of
361 the captive insurance company's surplus that which exceeds the
362 minimum stated in the agreement.
363 b. The minimum surplus or floor shall exceed the sum
364 of: (i) 10 percent of the face amount of the surplus note; and
Page 13

of: (i) 10 percent of the face amount of the surplus note; and
HB415 Enrolled
365 (ii) the greater of the statutory minimum capital or surplus
366 required by statute or the approved feasibility study or such
367 other amount approved by the commissioner.
368 c. Payments may only be made if the payment does not
369 affect the financial condition of the company.
370 d. Any payment of principal or interest requires the
371 prior approval of the commissioner."
372 "§27-31B-8
373 (a) A pure captive insurance company, an agency captive
374 insurance company, a reinsurance captive insurance company, a
375 special purpose financial captive insurance company, or a
376 protected cell captive insurance company shall be formed as a
377 stock or mutual insurer, or as a nonprofit or limited
378 liability company with its capital divided into units and held
379 by the stockholders, members, or other equivalent as allowed
380 by law.
381 (b) An association captive insurance company, an
382 industrial insured captive insurance company, or a risk
383 retention group may be formed in any of the following ways:
384 (1) Organized as a stock insurer with its capital
385 divided into share units and held by the stockholders,
386 members, or other equivalent as allowed by law.
387 (2) Organized as a mutual insurer without capital
388 stock, the governing body of which is elected by the member
389 organizations of its association.
390 (3) Organized as a reciprocal insurer in accordance
391 with Chapter 31 of this title.
392 (4) Organized as a manager-managed limited liability
Page 14

(4) Organized as a manager-managed limited liability
HB415 Enrolled
393 company.
394 (c) A captive insurance company incorporated or
395 organized in this state shall have one or more incorporators
396 or one or more organizers, at least one of which shall be a
397 resident of this state.
398 (d)(1) In the case of a captive insurance company
399 formed as a corporation, before the articles of incorporation
400 are transmitted to the Secretary of State, the incorporators
401 shall petition the commissioner to issue a certificate setting
402 forth the commissioner's finding that the establishment and
403 maintenance of the proposed corporation will promote the
404 general good of the state. In arriving at this finding the
405 commissioner shall consider all of the following:
406 a. The character, reputation, financial standing, and
407 purposes of the incorporators.
408 b. The character, reputation, financial responsibility,
409 insurance experience, and business qualifications of the
410 officers and directors.
411 c. Any other aspects as the commissioner shall deem
412 advisable.
413 (2) The articles of incorporation, the certificate, and
414 the organization fee shall be transmitted to the Secretary of
415 State, who shall thereupon record both the articles of
416 incorporation and the certificate.
417 (e) In the case of a captive insurance company formed
418 as a reciprocal insurer, the organizers shall petition the
419 commissioner to issue a certificate setting forth the
420 commissioner's finding that the establishment and maintenance
Page 15

commissioner's finding that the establishment and maintenance
HB415 Enrolled
421 of the proposed association will promote the general good of
422 the state. In arriving at this finding the commissioner shall
423 consider all of the following:
424 (1) The character, reputation, financial standing, and
425 purposes of the organizers.
426 (2) The character, reputation, financial
427 responsibility, insurance experience, and business
428 qualifications of the attorney-in-fact.
429 (3) The competence of any person who, pursuant to a
430 contract with the captive insurance company, will manage the
431 affairs of the company.
432 (4) The competence, reputation, and experience of the
433 company's legal counsel relating to the regulation of
434 insurance.
435 (5) The company's business plan.
436 (3)(6) Any other aspects as the commissioner shall deem
437 advisable.
438 (f) In the case of a captive insurance company licensed
439 as a branch captive insurance company, the alien captive
440 insurance company shall petition the commissioner to issue a
441 certificate setting forth the commissioner's finding that,
442 after considering the character, reputation, financial
443 responsibility, insurance experience, and business
444 qualifications of the officers and directors of the alien
445 captive insurance company, the competence of any person who,
446 pursuant to a contract with the captive insurance company,
447 will manage the affairs of the company, the competence,
448 reputation, and experience of the company's legal counsel
Page 16

reputation, and experience of the company's legal counsel
HB415 Enrolled
449 relating to the regulation of insurance, and the company's
450 business plan, the licensing and maintenance of the branch
451 operations will promote the general good of the state. The
452 alien captive insurance company may register to do business in
453 this state after the commissioner's certificate is issued.
454 (g) The capital stock of a captive insurance company
455 incorporated as a stock insurer may be authorized with no par
456 value.
457 (h) In the case of a captive insurance company, at
458 least one of the members of the board of directors, managing
459 members, or equivalents as allowed by law, shall be a resident
460 of this state.
461 (i) In the case of a captive insurance company formed
462 as a reciprocal insurer, at least one of the members of the
463 subscribers' advisory committee shall be a resident of this
464 state.
465 (j) Captive insurance companies formed as corporations
466 under this chapter shall have the privileges and be subject to
467 the general corporation law as well as the applicable
468 provisions of this chapter. In the event of conflict between
469 the general corporation law and this chapter, the latter shall
470 control. The provisions of this title pertaining to mergers,
471 consolidations, and conversions shall apply in determining the
472 procedures to be followed by captive insurance companies in
473 carrying out any of the transactions described therein, except
474 that the commissioner may waive or modify the requirements for
475 public notice and hearing in accordance with rules which the
476 commissioner may adopt addressing categories of transactions.
Page 17

commissioner may adopt addressing categories of transactions.
HB415 Enrolled
477 If a notice of public hearing is required, but no one requests
478 a hearing, then the commissioner may cancel the hearing.
479 (k)(1) Captive insurance companies formed as reciprocal
480 insurers under this chapter shall have the privileges and be
481 subject to Chapter 31 in addition to the applicable provisions
482 of this chapter. In the event of a conflict between Chapter 31
483 and this chapter, the latter shall control. To the extent a
484 reciprocal insurer is made subject to other provisions of this
485 title pursuant to Chapter 31, the provisions shall not be
486 applicable to a reciprocal insurer formed under this chapter
487 unless the provisions are expressly made applicable to captive
488 insurance companies under this chapter.
489 (2) In addition to subdivision (1), captive insurance
490 companies organized as reciprocal insurers that are industrial
491 insured groups as defined in paragraph b. of subdivision (19)
492 of Section 27-31B-2(19)b. shall have the privileges and be
493 subject to the provisions of Chapter 31A in addition to the
494 applicable provisions of this chapter.
495 (l) The articles of incorporation, organization, or
496 equivalent allowed by law, or bylaws of a captive insurance
497 company may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to
498 consist of no fewer than one-third of the fixed or prescribed
499 number of directors determined under Title 10 10A.
500 (m) The subscribers' agreement or other organizing
501 document of a captive insurance company formed as a reciprocal
502 insurer may authorize a quorum of a subscribers' advisory
503 committee to consist of no fewer than one-third of its
504 members."
Page 18

members."
HB415 Enrolled
505 "§27-31B-9
506 (a) Captive insurance companies shall not be required
507 to make any annual report except as provided in this chapter.
508 (b) Prior to March 1 of each year, each captive
509 insurance company shall submit to the commissioner a report of
510 its financial condition, verified by oath of two of its
511 executive officers. Except as provided in Section 27-31B-6,
512 each captive insurance company shall report using statutory
513 accounting principles, unless the commissioner approves the
514 use of generally accepted accounting principles, with any
515 useful or necessary modifications or adaptations thereof
516 required or approved or accepted by the commissioner for the
517 type of insurance and kinds of insurers to be reported upon,
518 and as supplemented by additional information required by the
519 commissioner. Except as otherwise provided, each association
520 captive insurance company and each industrial insured captive
521 insurance company insuring the risks of an industrial insured
522 group defined in paragraph b. of subdivision (18) of Section
523 27-31B-2(19)b. shall file its report in the form required by
524 Section 27-3-26. Each risk retention group shall file its
525 report in the form required by Section 27-3-26 and shall
526 comply with all filing requirements set forth in this title as
527 well as rules and bulletins of the Alabama Department of
528 Insurance applicable to casualty insurers domiciled in the
529 state. The commissioner shall by rule propose the forms in
530 which pure captive insurance companies and industrial insured
531 captive insurance companies insuring the risks of an
532 industrial insured group defined in paragraph a. of
Page 19

industrial insured group defined in paragraph a. of
HB415 Enrolled
533 subdivision (18) of Section 27-31B-2(19)a. shall report.
534 Subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of Section 27-31B-3(d)(4)
535 shall apply to each report filed pursuant to this section,
536 except the subdivision shall not apply to reports filed by
537 industrial insured captive insurance companies insuring the
538 risks of industrial insured groups as defined in paragraph b.
539 of subdivision (18) of Section 27-31B-2(19)b.
540 (c) Any pure captive insurance company or an industrial
541 insured captive insurance company insuring the risks of
542 industrial insured groups as defined in paragraph a. of
543 subdivision (18) of Section 27-31B-2(19)a. may make written
544 application for filing the required report on a fiscal
545 year-end. If an alternative reporting date is granted, the
546 annual report shall be due 60 days after the end of the fiscal
547 year and, in order to provide sufficient detail to support the
548 premium tax return, the pure captive insurance company or
549 industrial insured captive insurance company insuring the
550 risks of industrial insureds as defined in paragraph b. of
551 subdivision (18) of Section 27-31B-2(17) shall file prior to
552 March 1 of each year for each calendar year-end, pages 1, 2,
553 3, and 5 of the "Captive Annual Statement; Pure or Industrial
554 Insured," verified by oath of two of its executive officers.
555 (d) Sixty days after the fiscal year-end, a branch
556 captive insurance company shall file with the commissioner a
557 copy of all reports and statements required to be filed under
558 the laws of the jurisdiction in which the alien captive
559 insurance company is formed, verified by oath of two of its
560 executive officers. If the commissioner is satisfied that the
Page 20

executive officers. If the commissioner is satisfied that the
HB415 Enrolled
561 annual report filed by the alien captive insurance company in
562 its domiciliary jurisdiction provides adequate information
563 concerning the financial condition of the alien captive
564 insurance company, the commissioner may waive the requirement
565 for completion of the captive annual statement for business
566 written in the alien jurisdiction.
567 (e) Annually on or before June 30, an audited statement
568 of the captive insurer's financial condition prepared in
569 accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in
570 the United States for the preceding calendar year ending
571 December 31, which shall include all of the following:
572 a. The report of an independent certified public
573 accountant.
574 b. A balance sheet.
575 c. An income statement.
576 d. A statement of cash flows.
577 e. A statement of changes in capital and surplus.
578 f. Notes to financial statements.
579 (f) An annual actuarial certification of loss reserves
580 and loss expense reserves which includes an opinion of the
581 adequacy of the loss reserves and loss expense reserves of the
582 captive insurer, in a format acceptable to the commissioner,
583 shall be filed with the report required in subsection (b). The
584 person that certifies the reserves shall be approved by the
585 commissioner and shall be a qualified actuary as defined in
586 the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Quarterly
587 and Annual Statement Instructions-Property/Casualty."
588 Section 2. This act shall become effective June 1,
Page 21

Section 2. This act shall become effective June 1,
HB415 Enrolled
589 2026.
Page 22

2026.
HB415 Enrolled
590
591
592
593
594
595
596
597
598 ________________________________________________
599 Speaker of the House of Representatives
600
601
602
603 ________________________________________________
604 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
605
606
607 House of Representatives
608
609 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
610 was passed by the House 10-Mar-26, as amended.
611
612 John Treadwell
613 Clerk
614
615
616
617
618
619 Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed
620
621
622
Page 23